Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 352.115, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Retirement annuity formula. (a) This paragraph, in conjunction with section 352.116, subdivision 1, applies to a person who became a covered employee or a member of a pension fund listed in section 356.30, subdivision 3, before July 1, 1989, unless paragraph (b), in conjunction with section 352.116, subdivision 1a, produces a higher annuity amount, in which case paragraph (b) applies. new text begin (1) If the employee does not have allowable service after June 30, 2025,new text end the employee's new text begin retirement annuity is equal to the employee's new text end average salarydeleted text begin , as defined in section 352.01, subdivision 14a,deleted text end multiplied by 1.2 percent per year of allowable service for the first ten years and 1.7 percent for each later year of allowable service and pro rata for completed months less than a full year deleted text begin determines the amount of the retirement annuity to which the employee is entitleddeleted text end . new text begin (2) If the employee has allowable service after June 30, 2025, the employee's retirement annuity is equal to the employee's average salary multiplied by 1.2 percent per year of allowable service for the first ten years and 1.7 percent for each later year of allowable service through June 30, 2025, and 1.9 percent for each year of allowable service after June 30, 2025, and pro rata for completed months less than a full year. new text end (b) This paragraph applies to a person who has become at least 55 years old and first became a covered employee after June 30, 1989, and to any other covered employee who has become at least 55 years old and whose annuity amount, when calculated under this paragraph and in conjunction with section 352.116, subdivision 1a, is higher than it is when calculated under paragraph (a), in conjunction with section 352.116, subdivision 1. new text begin (1) If the employee does not have allowable service after June 30, 2025,new text end the employee's new text begin retirement annuity is equal to the employee's new text end average salarydeleted text begin , as defined in section 352.01, subdivision 14a,deleted text end multiplied by 1.7 percent for each year of allowable service and pro rata for new text begin completed new text end months less than a full year deleted text begin determines the amount of the retirement annuity to which the employee is entitleddeleted text end . new text begin (2) If the employee has allowable service after June 30, 2025, the employee's retirement annuity is equal to the employee's average salary multiplied by 1.7 percent for each year of allowable service through June 30, 2025, and 1.9 percent for each year of allowable service after June 30, 2025, and pro rata for completed months less than a full year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 356.415, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Annual postretirement adjustments; Minnesota State Retirement System general state employees retirement plan, legislators retirement plan, and unclassified state employees retirement program. (a) Recipients of a retirement annuity, disability benefit, or survivor benefit from the general state employees retirement plan, the legislators retirement plan, or the unclassified state employees retirement program are entitled to an annual postretirement adjustment, effective as of each January 1, as follows: deleted text begin (1) effective January 1, 2019, through December 31, 2023, a postretirement increase of one percent must be applied each year to the amount of the monthly annuity or benefit of each annuitant or benefit recipient who has been receiving an annuity or a benefit for at least 12 full months as of the June 30 of the calendar year immediately before the adjustment; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) effective January 1, 2019, through December 31, 2023, for each annuitant or benefit recipient who has been receiving an annuity or a benefit for at least one full month, but less than 12 full months as of the June 30 of the calendar year immediately before the adjustment, a postretirement increase of 1/12 of one percent for each month that the person has been receiving an annuity or benefit must be applied to the amount of the monthly annuity or benefit of the annuitant or benefit recipient; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end effective January 1, deleted text begin 2024deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , and thereafter, a postretirement increase of deleted text begin 1.5deleted text end new text begin 1.75new text end percent must be applied each year to the amount of the monthly annuity or benefit of each annuitant or benefit recipient who has been receiving an annuity or a benefit for at least 12 full months as of the June 30 of the calendar year immediately before the adjustment; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end effective January 1, deleted text begin 2024deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , and thereafter, for each annuitant or benefit recipient who has been receiving an annuity or a benefit for at least one full month, but less than 12 full months as of the June 30 of the calendar year immediately before the adjustment, an annual postretirement increase of 1/12 of deleted text begin 1.5deleted text end new text begin 1.75new text end percent for each month that the person has been receiving an annuity or benefit must be applied to the amount of the monthly annuity or benefit of the annuitant or benefit recipient. (b) An increase in annuity or benefit payments under this subdivision must be made automatically unless written notice is filed by the annuitant or benefit recipient with the executive director of the deleted text begin covereddeleted text end new text begin Minnesota Statenew text end Retirement deleted text begin plandeleted text end new text begin Systemnew text end requesting that the increase not be made. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for postretirement adjustments beginning on or after January 1, 2026. new text end